Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2,115
Easement; enforceability; duration.

No duly recorded conservation or preservation easement shall be unenforceable for lack of privity of estate or of contract, for lack of benefit to a dominant estate, or on account of the easement being assignable. A conservation or preservation easement shall run with the land and shall be perpetual unless otherwise stated in the instrument creating it. A conservation or preservation easement may be enforced by proceedings at law or in equity.

Laws 1981, LB 173, § 5.